xal.affix
FLAG num
SFX 286 Y 2
SFX 286 0 мудыг г
SFX 286 0 мудыг к

SFX 287 Y 2
SFX 287 0 мүдиг г
SFX 287 0 мүдиг к

SFX 288 Y 2
SFX 288 0 мудар г
SFX 288 0 мудар к

SFX 289 Y 2
SFX 289 0 мүдәр г
SFX 289 0 мүдәр к

SFX 290 Y 2
SFX 290 0 мудла г
SFX 290 0 мудла к

SFX 291 Y 2
SFX 291 0 мүдлә г
SFX 291 0 мүдлә к

SFX 292 Y 2
SFX 292 0 мудта г
SFX 292 0 мудта к

SFX 293 Y 2
SFX 293 0 мүдтә г
SFX 293 0 мүдтә к

SFX 294 Y 2
SFX 294 0 мудас г
SFX 294 0 мудас к

SFX 295 Y 2
SFX 295 0 мүдәс г
SFX 295 0 мүдәс к

SFX 296 Y 2
SFX 296 0 мудур г
SFX 296 0 мудур к

SFX 297 Y 2
SFX 297 0 мүдүр г
SFX 297 0 мүдүр к
