xal.dict
аг/29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41145,146,147,148,149,150,151,152,153,154,155,156,157,190,191,192,193,194,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,202,203,204,235,236,237,238,239,240,241,268,269,270,271,272,273,274,275,276,277,278,279,280,281,282,283,284,285,286,287,288,289,290,291,292,293,294,295,296,297
